Hawaii statutes.
§205A-30 Emergency and minor permits. Each
county authority shall provide specific procedures consistent with this part
for the issuance of special management area emergency permits or special
management area minor permits, pursuant to the procedural requirements within
this part, and judicial review from the grant and denial thereof. The lead
agency shall file notice of special management area minor permits in the next
available issue of the periodic bulletin of the office of environmental quality
control. [L 1975, c 176, pt of §1; am L 1979, c 200, §13; am L 2001, c 169, §7]

Case Notes

Where the appellant failed to file an appeal with the Maui
planning commission regarding the county director of planning's issuance of a
special management area minor permit, the doctrine of primary jurisdiction
warranted dismissal of the case; the circuit court did not abuse its discretion
in choosing to refrain from exercising jurisdiction. 132 H. 472 (App.), 323
P.3d 116 (2012).

Where the defendants contended that the case was moot because
it pertained to the issuance of a special management area minor permit for an
event that occurred prior to appeal, the appeal retained vitality because the
questions presented were of public concern and, in the likely event that they
recurred in the future, were of a nature that would likely become moot before
they could be determined on appeal. 132 H. 472 (App.), 323 P.3d 116 (2012).

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next